Washington statutes.
RCW 9.96.080

Victims of certain crimes vacating records of conviction.

(1)(a) A victim of sex trafficking, prostitution, or commercial sexual abuse of a minor; sexual assault; or domestic violence, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 may apply to the sentencing court or the sentencing court's successor to vacate the applicant's record of conviction for the offense; or

(b) The prosecutor of a county or municipality in which a victim of sex trafficking, prostitution, or commercial sexual abuse of a minor; sexual assault; or domestic violence was sentenced for a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor offense may exercise discretion to apply to the court on behalf of the state recommending that the court vacate the victim's record of conviction by submitting the information required in subsection (2) of this section. If the court finds the application meets the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, the court may decide whether to grant the application to vacate the record.

(2) In order to vacate a record of conviction for a gross misdemeanor or misdemeanor offense committed as a result of being a victim of sex trafficking, prostitution, or commercial sexual abuse of a minor; sexual assault; or domestic violence as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, the applicant must meet the following requirements:

(a) Provide an affidavit, under penalty of perjury, stating the specific facts and circumstances proving, by a preponderance of evidence that the offense was committed as a result of being a victim of sex trafficking, prostitution, or commercial sexual abuse of a minor; sexual assault; or domestic violence as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(b) There are no criminal charges against the applicant pending in any court of this state or another state, or in any federal court for any crime other than prostitution;

(c) If the offense is a misdemeanor, the offender has not been convicted of a new crime in this state, another state, or federal or tribal court in the three years prior to the vacation application;

(d) Except where the conviction to be vacated is for the crime of prostitution, prostitution loitering, or stay out of area of prostitution, provide proof that the crime victim penalty assessment, RCW 7.68.035, has been paid in full;

(e) If applicable, restitution owed to any victim, excluding restitution owed to any insurance provider under Title 48 RCW, has been paid in full.

(3) An applicant may not have a record of conviction for a gross misdemeanor or misdemeanor offense vacated if:

(a) The offense was any misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor violation, including attempt, of chapter 9.68 RCW (obscenity and pornography), chapter 9.68A RCW (sexual exploitation of children), or chapter 9A.44 RCW (sex offenses), except for failure to register as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.132;

(b) The offense was a conviction as described in RCW 46.61.5055; or

(c) The offense was patronizing a prostitute as described in RCW 9A.88.110.

[ 2021 c 237 s 5.]